Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 71-5-1.
Citation and purpose.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Employment Security Law.” The purpose of the law is to promote employment security by increasing opportunities for placement through the maintenance of a system of public employment offices and to provide through the accumulation of reserves for the payment of compensation to individuals with respect to their unemployment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7368; Laws, 1936, ch. 176; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 1, eff July 1, 1948, unless context expressly provides otherwise.

§ 71-5-3.
Public policy.

As a guide to the interpretation and application of this chapter, the public policy of this state is declared to be as follows: Economic insecurity due to unemployment is a serious menace to the health, morals, and welfare of the people of this state. Involuntary unemployment is therefore a subject of general interest and concern which requires appropriate action by the legislature to prevent its spread and to lighten its burden, which now so often falls with crushing force upon the unemployed worker and his family. The achievement of social security requires protection against this greatest hazard of our economic life. This can be provided by encouraging employers to provide more stable employment and by the systematic accumulation of funds during periods of employment to provide benefits for periods of unemployment, thus maintaining purchasing power and limiting the serious social consequences of poor relief assistance. The legislature, therefore, declares that in its considered judgment the public good and the general welfare of the citizens of this state require the enactment of this measure, under the police powers of the state, for the compulsory setting aside of unemployment reserves to be used for the benefit of persons unemployed through no fault of their own.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7369; Laws, 1936, ch. 176; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 3.

§ 71-5-5.
Suspension under federal conditions [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The Legislature finds and declares that the existence and continued operation of a federal tax upon employers, against which some portion of the contributions required under this chapter may be credited, will protect Mississippi employers from undue disadvantages in their competition with employers in other states. If at any time, upon a formal complaint to the Governor, he shall find that Title IX of the Social Security Act has been amended or repealed by Congress or has been held unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United States, and that, as a result thereof, the provisions of this chapter requiring Mississippi employers to pay contributions will subject them to a serious competitive disadvantage in relation to employers in other states, he shall publish such findings and proclaim that the operation of the provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of contributions and benefits shall be suspended for a period of not more than six (6) months. The Department of Employment Security shall thereupon requisition from the Unemployment Trust Fund all monies therein standing to its credit, and shall deposit such monies, together with any other monies in the Unemployment Compensation Fund, as a special fund in any banks or public depositories in this state in which general funds of the state may be deposited.

In all other cases, and unless the Governor shall issue such proclamation, this chapter shall remain in full force and effect.

If within the aforesaid six-month period the Governor shall find that other federal legislation has been enacted which avoids the competitive disadvantage herein described, he shall forthwith publicly so proclaim, and upon the date of such proclamation, the provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of contributions and benefits shall again become fully operative as of the date of such suspension with the same effect as if such suspension had not occurred. If within such six-month period no such other federal legislation is enacted or the Legislature of this state has not otherwise prescribed, the Department of Employment Security shall, under regulations prescribed by it, refund, without interest, to each employer by whom contributions have been paid his pro rata share of the total contributions paid under this chapter. Any interest or earnings of the fund shall be available to the Department of Employment Security to pay for the costs of making such refunds. When the Department of Employment Security shall have executed the duties herein prescribed and performed such other acts as are incidental to the termination of its duties under this chapter, the Governor shall, by public proclamation, declare that the provisions of this chapter, in their entirety, shall cease to be operative.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7370; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013); reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 8, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-7.
Suspension under state conditions.

If at any time the provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of contributions and benefits shall be held invalid under the Constitution of this state by the Supreme Court of this state or invalid under the United States Constitution by the Supreme Court of the United States, the department shall forthwith requisition from the unemployment trust fund all monies therein standing to the credit of the department, and shall deposit such monies, together with any other monies in the unemployment compensation fund, in any banks or public depositories in this state in which general funds of the state may be deposited. If within six (6) months after the date of such decision the Legislature of this state enacts a new unemployment compensation law, such monies shall be paid into the unemployment compensation fund established thereunder. If within such six-month period the Legislature of this state has not enacted a new unemployment compensation law, the department shall, under regulations prescribed by it, refund, without interest, to each employer by whom contributions have been paid, his pro rata share of the total contributions paid under this chapter. Any interest or earnings of the fund shall be available to the department to pay for the costs of making such refunds. The provisions of this chapter, so far as necessary to the execution by the department of the duties prescribed in this section and to the performance of such other acts as are incidental to the termination of its duties under this chapter, shall remain in full force and effect until the completion thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7371; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-9.
Refunds upon termination.

Refunds provided under Sections 71-5-5 and 71-5-7 shall not be subject to any provisions of law requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of moneys in their custody.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7372; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 3.